Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-932
Interjurisdictional planning commission; creation; elimination.

A city or village exercising extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction under the circumstances set out in section 19-930 shall create an interjurisdictional planning commission by ordinance within sixty days after the formal passage of a resolution pursuant to subsection (2) of section 19-930. All matters filed with the city or village within ninety days after such date which are properly within the jurisdiction of the interjurisdictional planning commission shall, after the effective date of the ordinance, be referred to such commission until such time as both the city or village and the county agree by majority vote of each governing body to eliminate the interjurisdictional planning commission and transfer its jurisdiction to the planning commission of the city or village.

Laws 1993, LB 207, § 6;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 98.